Massachusetts, session 194th, H4496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any policy, 
contract or certificate of health insurance subject to chapters 32A, 175, 176A, 176B, 176G, 176I, 
176J or 176Q of the General Laws, that provides prescription drug coverage in the state, must 
permit and apply a pro-rated daily cost-sharing rate to prescriptions that are dispensed by a 
network pharmacy for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist determines the fill or refill 
to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial supply for the 
purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications.  
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall 
deny coverage for the dispensing of a medication that is dispensed by a network pharmacy on the 
basis that the dispensing is for a partial supply if the prescriber or pharmacist determines the fill 
or refill to be in the best interest of the patient and the patient requests or agrees to a partial 
supply for the purpose of synchronizing the patient’s medications. The individual or group health 

of 2 13 plan must allow a pharmacy to override any denial codes indicating that a prescription is being 
refilled too soon for the purposes of medication synchronization.   
No individual or group health insurance policy providing prescription drug coverage shall 
use payment structures incorporating pro-rated dispensing fees. Dispensing fees for partially 
filled or refilled prescriptions shall be paid in full for each prescription dispensed, regardless of 
any pro-rated copay for the beneficiary or fee paid for alignment services.